Illinois, session 104th, SB1968.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Health Care and Public Benefits Stakeholder Council 6Act. 7    Section 5. Illinois Health Care and Public Benefits 8Stakeholder Council. Illinois Health Care and Public Benefits 9Stakeholder Council is created to ensure that residents 10impacted by Illinois health care systems and public aid 11benefits have a voice in the State's implementation of various 12programs across State agencies. The Council shall have the 13following objectives and duties:14        (1) Ensure meaningful inclusion in Council matters of 15    families, young people, persons with disabilities, older 16    residents, and others engaged in the health care system 17    and public benefits systems within the State.18        (2) Identify current shortfalls in the various 19    programs implemented at the State level, including, but 20    not limited to, the medical assistance program, the 21    Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, the Women, 22    Infants and Children Program, the Temporary Assistance for 23    Needy Families program, the Child Care Assistance Program,   SB1968- 2 -LRB104 10152 KTG 20224 b1    and the Community Care Program.2        (3) Recommend an overarching organizational structure 3    to ensure coordination, alignment, and progress to assist 4    all Illinoisans in accessing benefits at the State level. 5    Section 10. Membership. Members of the Illinois Health 6Care and Public Benefits Stakeholder Council must represent 7the diversity of this State and possess the expertise and 8lived experiences needed to perform the objectives of the 9Council. Council members shall be appointed by the Governor 10and shall select from among themselves a chairperson or 11co-chairpersons at the initial Council meeting. Members of the 12Council shall include the following:13        (1) One representative with lived experience as a 14    person living with a disability.15        (2) One representative who is an older Illinoisan.16        (3) One representative who works in the health care 17    field.18        (4) One representative who is a parent or guardian 19    with lived experience accessing public benefits.20        (5) Up to 3 additional representatives from 21    community-based organizations who have expertise in 22    policies and practices within health care, public health, 23    child welfare, and human services. 24    Section 15. State agency attendance at Council meetings.   SB1968- 3 -LRB104 10152 KTG 20224 b1The heads of the following State agencies, or their designees, 2must attend at least 2 Council hearings in an advisory role:3        (1) Department of Human Services.4        (2) Department of Children and Family Services.5        (3) Department on Aging.6        (4) Department of Healthcare and Family Services.7        (5) Department of Early Childhood. 8    Section 20. Meetings. The Illinois Health Care and Public 9Benefits Stakeholder Council shall meet at the call of the 10Chair at least 4 times beginning January 1, 2026. 11    Section 25. Reports. The Illinois Health Care and Public 12Benefits Stakeholder Council shall submit a report of its 13findings and recommendations to the General Assembly and the 14Governor by July 1, 2027. The Council is dissolved, and this 15Act is repealed, on July 1, 2028. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.